District of Columbia statutes.
38-1801.02

Superintendent’s report on reforms.

Not later than December 1, 1996, the Superintendent shall submit to the appropriate congressional committees, the Board of Education, the Mayor, the Consensus Commission, and the District of Columbia Council a report regarding the progress of the District of Columbia public schools toward achieving the goals of the long-term reform plan.

Apr. 26, 1996, 110 Stat. 1321 234, Pub. L. 104-134, § 2102
1981 Ed., § 31-2853.2.